District of Columbia statutes.
8-1402

Definition.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “hazardous materials” means substances or materials in a quantity and form that may pose an unreasonable risk to health, safety, or property when transported in commerce and includes explosives, radioactive materials, etiological agents, flammable liquids or solids, combustible liquids or solids, poisons, oxidizing or corrosive materials, or compressed gases.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-190, § 3, 35 DCR 8663

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3302.